Florida, session 2026, HB1485.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:

Section 1. Section 267.23, Florida Statutes, is created to
read:
267.23 Historic Cemeteries Trust Fund.—
(1) The Historic Cemeteries Trust Fund is created within
the division. The purpose of the trust fund is to act as a
depository for the long-term maintenance and upkeep of
cemeteries under the Historic Cemeteries Program.
(2) Moneys must be deposited into the trust fund and
disbursed by the division as provided in s. 267.21.
(3) Notwithstanding s. 216.301 and pursuant to s. 216.351,
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1485-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1485 2026
any balance in the trust fund at the end of any fiscal year must
remain in the trust fund at the end of the year and must be
available for carrying out the purposes of the trust fund.
(4) In accordance with s. 19(f), Art. III of the State
Constitution, the Historic Cemeteries Trust Fund, unless
terminated sooner, shall be terminated on July 1, 2030. Before
its scheduled termination, the trust fund must be reviewed as
provided in s. 215.3206(1) and (2).
Section 2. This act shall take effect on the same date
that HB 425 or similar legislation takes effect, if such
legislation is adopted in the same legislative session or an
extension thereof and becomes a law.
Page 2 of 2
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1485-00